hr-HR: Model Sunčevog sustava uključuje tijela: Samo 8 planeta (bez Sunca); Ceres; Erida); Haumea; Uključuje samo Zemljin mjesec; Uključuje Kuiperov pojas; Uključuje Pluton; Uključuje pojas asteroida; Uključuje patuljaste planete (Pluton; Uključuje više mjeseca (ovisi o planetu); Makemake; Sunce + 8 planeta; Sunce + 8 planeta + pojas asteroida; Sunce + 8 planeta + patuljasti planeti; Sunce + 8 planeta + mjeseci; Sunce + 8 planeta + detalji prstenova; Ostalo
pl: Ciała niebieskie dołączone do modelu układu słonecznego: Tylko 8 planet (bez słońca); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Tylko z ziemskim Księżycem; Z pasem Kuipera; Zawiera Plutona; Z pasem planetoid; Z planetami karłowatymi (Pluton; Z wieloma księżycami (zależnie od planety); Makemake; Słońce + 8 planet; Słońce + 8 planet + pas planetoid; Słońce + 8 planet + planety karłowate; Słońce + 8 planet + księżyce; Słońce + 8 planet + szczegóły pierścieni; Inne
it: Il modello del sistema solare includeva i corpi: Solo 8 pianeti (senza sole); Cerere; Eris); Haumea; Include solo la luna terrestre; Include fascia di Kuiper; Include Plutone; Include fascia degli asteroidi; Include pianeti nani (Plutone; Include più lune (varia in base al pianeta); Makemake; Sole + 8 pianeti; Sole + 8 pianeti + fascia degli asteroidi; Sole + 8 pianeti + pianeti nani; Sole + 8 pianeti + lune; Sole + 8 pianeti + dettagli degli anelli; Altro
ru: Входящие в модель Солнечной системы небесные тела: Только 8 планет (без Солнца); Церера; Эрида); Хаумеа; Включает только Луну; Включает пояс Койпера; Включает Плутон; Включает пояс астероидов; Включает карликовые планеты (Плутон; Включает несколько спутников (зависит от планеты); Макемаке; Солнце + 8 планет; Солнце + 8 планет + пояс астероидов; Солнце + 8 планет + карликовые планеты; Солнце + 8 планет + спутники; Солнце + 8 планет + детализация колец; Другое
vi: Mô hình hệ mặt trời bao gồm các thiên thể: Chỉ 8 hành tinh (không có mặt trời); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Chỉ bao gồm mặt trăng của Trái Đất; Bao gồm vành đai Kuiper; Bao gồm Sao Diêm Vương; Bao gồm vành đai tiểu hành tinh; Bao gồm hành tinh lùn (Sao Diêm Vương; Bao gồm nhiều mặt trăng (tùy theo hành tinh); Makemake; Mặt trời + 8 hành tinh; Mặt trời + 8 hành tinh + vành đai tiểu hành tinh; Mặt trời + 8 hành tinh + hành tinh lùn; Mặt trời + 8 hành tinh + mặt trăng; Mặt trời + 8 hành tinh + chi tiết vành đai; Khác
cs: Model sluneční soustavy včetně těles: Pouze 8 planet (bez Slunce); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Obsahuje pouze Měsíc Země; Obsahuje Kuiperův pás; Obsahuje Pluto; Obsahuje pás asteroidů; Obsahuje trpasličí planety (Pluto; Obsahuje více měsíců (liší se podle planety); Makemake; Slunce a 8 planet; Slunce, 8 planet a pás asteroidů; Slunce, 8 planet a trpasličí planety; Slunce, 8 planet a měsíce; Slunce, 8 planet a detaily prstenců; Jiné
tr: Güneş sistemi modelinde yer alan gök cisimleri: Yalnızca 8 gezegen (Güneş yok); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Yalnızca Dünya'nın uydusu dahil; Kuiper kuşağı dahil; Plüton dahil; Asteroit kuşağı dahil; Cüce gezegenler dahil (Plüton; Çoklu uydu dahil (gezegene göre değişir); Makemake; Güneş + 8 gezegen; Güneş + 8 gezegen + asteroit kuşağı; Güneş + 8 gezegen + cüce gezegenler; Güneş + 8 gezegen + uydular; Güneş + 8 gezegen + halka detayı; Diğer
fi: Aurinkokuntamalliin sisältyvät taivaankappaleet: Vain 8 planeettaa (ei aurinkoa); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Sisältää vain Maan kuun; Sisältää Kuiperin vyöhykkeen; Sisältää Pluton; Sisältää asteroidivyöhykkeen; Sisältää kääpiöplaneetat (Pluto; Sisältää useita kuita (vaihtelee planeetoittain); Makemake; Aurinko ja 8 planeettaa; Aurinko, 8 planeettaa ja asteroidivyöhyke; Aurinko, 8 planeettaa ja kääpiöplaneetat; Aurinko, 8 planeettaa ja kuut; Aurinko, 8 planeettaa ja renkaat; Muu
ro-RO: Corpuri incluse în modelul sistemului solar: Doar cele 8 planete (fără soare); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Include doar luna Pământului; Include centura Kuiper; Include Pluto; Include centura de asteroizi; Include planete pitice (Pluto; Include mai multe luni (variază în funcție de planetă); Makemake; Soare + 8 planete; Soare + 8 planete + centura de asteroizi; Soare + 8 planete + planete pitice; Soare + 8 planete + luni; Soare + 8 planete + detalii inele; Altele
pt-PT: Corpos celestes incluídos no modelo do sistema solar: Apenas 8 planetas (sem sol); Ceres; Éris; Haumea; Inclui apenas a lua da Terra; Inclui cintura de Kuiper; Inclui Plutão; Inclui cintura de asteroides; Inclui planetas anões (Plutão); Inclui várias luas (varia consoante o planeta); Makemake; Sol e 8 planetas; Sol, 8 planetas e cintura de asteroides; Sol, 8 planetas e planetas anões; Sol, 8 planetas e luas; Sol, 8 planetas e detalhes de anéis; Outro
hu: Naprendszer-modell égitestekkel: Csak 8 bolygó (nap nélkül); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Csak a Föld holdját tartalmazza; Kuiper-övet tartalmaz; Plútóval; Aszteroidaövet tartalmaz; Törpebolygókkal (Plútó; Több holddal (bolygónként változó); Makemake; Nap + 8 bolygó; Nap + 8 bolygó + aszteroidaöv; Nap + 8 bolygó + törpebolygók; Nap + 8 bolygó + holdak; Nap + 8 bolygó + részletes gyűrűk; Egyéb
lt-LT: Įtraukti Saulės sistemos modelio kūnai: Tik 8 planetos (be Saulės); Cerera; Eridė); Haumėja; Tik su Žemės Mėnuliu; Su Koiperio žiedu; Su Plutonu; Su asteroidų žiedu; Su nykštukinėmis planetomis (Plutonu; Su keliais palydovais (priklauso nuo planetos); Makemakė; Saulė ir 8 planetos; Saulė, 8 planetos ir asteroidų žiedas; Saulė, 8 planetos ir nykštukinės planetos; Saulė, 8 planetos ir palydovai; Saulė, 8 planetos ir detalūs žiedai; Kita
da: Himmellegemer inkluderet i solsystemmodel: Kun 8 planeter (ingen sol); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Inkluderer kun Jordens måne; Inkluderer Kuiperbæltet; Inkluderer Pluto; Inkluderer asteroidebælte; Inkluderer dværgplaneter (Pluto; Inkluderer flere måner (varierer efter planet); Makemake; Solen og 8 planeter; Solen, 8 planeter og asteroidebælte; Solen, 8 planeter og dværgplaneter; Solen, 8 planeter og måner; Solen, 8 planeter og ringdetaljer; Andet
nb: Inkluderte legemer i solsystemmodell: Kun 8 planeter (ingen sol); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Inkluderer kun jordens måne; Inkluderer Kuiperbeltet; Inkluderer Pluto; Inkluderer asteroidebeltet; Inkluderer dvergplaneter (Pluto; Inkluderer flere måner (varierer etter planet); Makemake; Sol + 8 planeter; Sol + 8 planeter + asteroidebeltet; Sol + 8 planeter + dvergplaneter; Sol + 8 planeter + måner; Sol + 8 planeter + ringdetaljer; Annet
ja: 太陽系モデル付属天体: 8惑星のみ (太陽なし); ケレス; エリス); ハウメア; 地球の月のみ含む; カイパーベルトを含む; 冥王星を含む; 小惑星帯を含む; 準惑星を含む (冥王星; 複数の月を含む (惑星により異なる); マケマケ; 太陽 + 8惑星; 太陽 + 8惑星 + 小惑星帯; 太陽 + 8 惑星 + 準惑星; 太陽 + 8惑星 + 月; 太陽 + 8惑星 + 環の詳細; その他
es: Cuerpos incluidos en el modelo del sistema solar: Solo 8 planetas (sin sol); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Incluye solo la luna de la Tierra; Incluye cinturón de Kuiper; Incluye Plutón; Incluye cinturón de asteroides; Incluye planetas enanos (Plutón; Incluye varias lunas (varía según el planeta); Makemake; Sol y 8 planetas; Sol + 8 planetas + cinturón de asteroides; Sol + 8 planetas + planetas enanos; Sol + 8 planetas + lunas; Sol + 8 planetas + detalle de anillos; Otro
zh-TW: 太陽系模型包含天體: 僅 8 大行星 (無太陽); 穀神星; 鬩神星); 妊神星; 僅包含地球月亮; 包含古柏帶; 包含冥王星; 包含小行星帶; 包含矮行星 (冥王星; 包含多個月亮 (依行星而異); 鳥神星; 太陽 + 8 大行星; 太陽 + 8 大行星 + 小行星帶; 太陽 + 8 大行星 + 矮行星; 太陽 + 8 大行星 + 月亮; 太陽 + 8 大行星 + 行星環細節; 其他
en: Solar system model included bodies: 8 planets only (no sun); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Includes Earth moon only; Includes Kuiper belt; Includes Pluto; Includes asteroid belt; Includes dwarf planets (Pluto; Includes multiple moons (varies by planet); Makemake; Sun + 8 planets; Sun + 8 planets + asteroid belt; Sun + 8 planets + dwarf planets; Sun + 8 planets + moons; Sun + 8 planets + rings detail; Other
el: Μοντέλο ηλιακού συστήματος που περιλαμβάνει σώματα: Μόνο 8 πλανήτες (χωρίς ήλιο); Δήμητρα; Έρις); Χαουμέα; Περιλαμβάνει μόνο τη σελήνη της Γης; Περιλαμβάνει ζώνη του Κάιπερ; Περιλαμβάνει τον Πλούτωνα; Περιλαμβάνει ζώνη αστεροειδών; Περιλαμβάνει πλανήτες-νάνους (Πλούτωνας; Περιλαμβάνει πολλαπλούς δορυφόρους (διαφέρει ανά πλανήτη); Μακεμάκε; Ήλιος + 8 πλανήτες; Ήλιος + 8 πλανήτες + ζώνη αστεροειδών; Ήλιος + 8 πλανήτες + πλανήτες-νάνοι; Ήλιος + 8 πλανήτες + δορυφόροι; Ήλιος + 8 πλανήτες + λεπτομέρειες δακτυλίων; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vključena nebesna telesa v modelu osončja: Samo 8 planetov (brez sonca); Cerera; Erida); Haumea; Vključuje samo Zemljino luno; Vključuje Kuiperjev pas; Vključuje Pluton; Vključuje asteroidni pas; Vključuje pritlikave planete (Pluton; Vključuje več lun (razlikuje se glede na planet); Makemake; Sonce in 8 planetov; Sonce, 8 planetov in asteroidni pas; Sonce, 8 planetov in pritlikavi planeti; Sonce, 8 planetov in lune; Sonce, 8 planetov in podrobnosti obročev; Drugo
bg-BG: Включени небесни тела в модела на Слънчевата система: Само 8 планети (без слънце); Церера; Ерида); Хаумея; Включва само луната на Земята; Включва пояс на Кайпер; Включва Плутон; Включва астероиден пояс; Включва планети джуджета (Плутон; Включва множество луни (различно според планетата); Макемаке; Слънце + 8 планети; Слънце + 8 планети + астероиден пояс; Слънце + 8 планети + планети джуджета; Слънце + 8 планети + луни; Слънце + 8 планети + детайли на пръстените; Друго
ko: 태양계 모형 포함 천체: 8개 행성만(태양 제외); 세레스; 에리스); 하우메아; 지구 달만 포함; 카이퍼대 포함; 명왕성 포함; 소행성대 포함; 왜소행성 포함(명왕성; 다중 위성 포함(행성별 상이); 마케마케; 태양 및 8개 행성; 태양, 8개 행성 및 소행성대; 태양, 8개 행성 및 왜소행성; 태양, 8개 행성 및 위성; 태양, 8개 행성 및 고리 디테일; 기타
zh-CN: 太阳系模型包含天体: 仅包含八大行星（无太阳）; 谷神星; 阋神星）; 妊神星; 仅包含地球和月球; 包含柯伊伯带; 包含冥王星; 包含小行星带; 包含矮行星（冥王星; 包含多颗卫星（因行星而异）; 鸟神星; 太阳 + 八大行星; 太阳 + 八大行星 + 小行星带; 太阳 + 八大行星 + 矮行星; 太阳 + 八大行星 + 卫星; 太阳 + 八大行星 + 行星环细节; 其他
nl: Zonnestelselmodel meegeleverde hemellichamen: Alleen 8 planeten (geen zon); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Alleen inclusief de maan van de aarde; Inclusief Kuipergordel; Inclusief Pluto; Inclusief planetoïdengordel; Inclusief dwergplaneten (Pluto; Inclusief meerdere manen (verschilt per planeet); Makemake; Zon + 8 planeten; Zon + 8 planeten + planetoïdengordel; Zon + 8 planeten + dwergplaneten; Zon + 8 planeten + manen; Zon + 8 planeten + ringdetails; Anders
pt-BR: Modelo de sistema solar corpos incluídos: Apenas os 8 planetas (sem o Sol); Ceres; Éris); Haumea; Inclui apenas a lua da Terra; Inclui cinturão de Kuiper; Inclui Plutão; Inclui cinturão de asteroides; Inclui planetas anões (Plutão; Inclui várias luas (varia de acordo com o planeta); Makemake; Sol + 8 planetas; Sol + 8 planetas + cinturão de asteroides; Sol + 8 planetas + planetas anões; Sol + 8 planetas + luas; Sol + 8 planetas + detalhes de anéis; Outros
sk-SK: Model slnečnej sústavy vrátane telies: Len 8 planét (bez Slnka); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Zahŕňa len Mesiac; Zahŕňa Kuiperov pás; Zahŕňa Pluto; Zahŕňa pás planétok; Zahŕňa trpasličie planéty (Pluto; Zahŕňa viacero mesiacov (líši sa podľa planéty); Makemake; Slnko a 8 planét; Slnko, 8 planét a pás planétok; Slnko, 8 planét a trpasličie planéty; Slnko, 8 planét a mesiace; Slnko, 8 planét a detaily prstencov; Iné
de: Enthaltene Himmelskörper im Sonnensystemmodell: Nur 8 Planeten (ohne Sonne); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Nur inklusive Erdmond; Inklusive Kuipergürtel; Inklusive Pluto; Inklusive Asteroidengürtel; Inklusive Zwergplaneten (Pluto; Inklusive mehrerer Monde (je nach Planet); Makemake; Sonne + 8 Planeten; Sonne + 8 Planeten + Asteroidengürtel; Sonne + 8 Planeten + Zwergplaneten; Sonne + 8 Planeten + Monde; Sonne + 8 Planeten + Ringdetails; Andere
th: แบบจำลองระบบสุริยะที่ประกอบด้วยวัตถุต่างๆ: ดาวเคราะห์ 8 ดวงเท่านั้น (ไม่มีดวงอาทิตย์); ซีรีส; อีริส); เฮาเมอา; รวมดวงจันทร์ของโลกเท่านั้น; รวมแถบไคเปอร์; รวมดาวพลูโต; รวมแถบดาวเคราะห์น้อย; รวมดาวเคราะห์แคระ (ดาวพลูโต; รวมดวงจันทร์หลายดวง (ขึ้นอยู่กับดาวเคราะห์); มาคีมาคี; ดวงอาทิตย์ + ดาวเคราะห์ 8 ดวง; ดวงอาทิตย์ + ดาวเคราะห์ 8 ดวง + แถบดาวเคราะห์น้อย; ดวงอาทิตย์ + ดาวเคราะห์ 8 ดวง + ดาวเคราะห์แคระ; ดวงอาทิตย์ + ดาวเคราะห์ 8 ดวง + ดวงจันทร์; ดวงอาทิตย์ + ดาวเคราะห์ 8 ดวง + วงแหวนแบบละเอียด; อื่นๆ
fr: Corps célestes inclus dans le modèle du système solaire: 8 planètes uniquement (sans soleil); Cérès; Éris); Hauméa; Comprend la lune de la Terre uniquement; Comprend la ceinture de Kuiper; Comprend Pluton; Comprend la ceinture d’astéroïdes; Comprend les planètes naines (Pluton; Comprend plusieurs lunes (varie selon la planète); Makémaké; Soleil + 8 planètes; Soleil + 8 planètes + ceinture d’astéroïdes; Soleil + 8 planètes + planètes naines; Soleil + 8 planètes + lunes; Soleil + 8 planètes + détail des anneaux; Autre
sv: Solsystemmodellens ingående himlakroppar: Endast 8 planeter (ingen sol); Ceres; Eris); Haumea; Inkluderar endast jordens måne; Inkluderar Kuiperbältet; Inkluderar Pluto; Inkluderar asteroidbältet; Inkluderar dvärgplaneter (Pluto; Inkluderar flera månar (varierar beroende på planet); Makemake; Sol + 8 planeter; Sol + 8 planeter + asteroidbältet; Sol + 8 planeter + dvärgplaneter; Sol + 8 planeter + månar; Sol + 8 planeter + ringdetaljer; Övrigt